Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2437YH (2) 91 jm/md H.F. 221 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 75.1A Bond issuance by school 1 districts ââ limitation. 2 For projects for which a proposition to issue bonds by a 3 school district was approved at an election held after July 1, 4 2025, the total amount of such bonds issued for the project 5 under any provision of law shall not exceed an amount equal to 6 eighty percent of the total cost of the project. The remaining 7 costs of the project shall be funded from sources other than 8 from the sale of bonds. 9